Udmurt.aff
# таӵе кылъёслы: пель-ы, син-мы, ныр-ы, ки-ы, мылкыд-ы, лул-ы, тусбуй-ыз, вылтыр-ы, ныд-ыз, ныл-ы, вын-ыд
SFX h Y 447 		 
SFX h 0 ы [^и][^н]
SFX h 0 ыд .
SFX h 0 ыз .
SFX h 0 мы .
SFX h 0 эз [дзлнсту]
SFX h 0 ез [^дзлнст]
SFX h 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX h 0 мес . 
SFX h 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]  #2л.
SFX h 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX h 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX h 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX h 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX h 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX h 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX h 0 ылэн .
SFX h 0 ыдлэн .
SFX h 0 ызлэн .
SFX h 0 мылэн .
SFX h 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX h 0 ылэсь .
SFX h 0 ыдлэсь .
SFX h 0 ызлэсь .
SFX h 0 мылэсь .
SFX h 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX h 0 ылы .
SFX h 0 ыдлы .
SFX h 0 ызлы .
SFX h 0 мылы .
SFX h 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX h 0 ытэк .
SFX h 0 ыдтэк .
SFX h 0 ызтэк .
SFX h 0 мытэк .
SFX h 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX h 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX h 0 ыя .
SFX h 0 ыдъя .
SFX h 0 ызъя .
SFX h 0 мыя .
SFX h 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 ын . #твор.п. + местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX h 0 ыным .
SFX h 0 ынымы .
SFX h 0 ыныд .
SFX h 0 ыныды .
SFX h 0 ыныз .
SFX h 0 ынызы .	
SFX h 0 ам [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 амы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 ад [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 ады [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 аз [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 азы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 ям [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 ямы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 яд [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 яды [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 яз [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h 0 язы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX h ь ям ь
SFX h ь ямы ь
SFX h ь яд ь
SFX h ь яды ь
SFX h ь яз ь
SFX h ь язы ь
SFX h 0 ысь . #исходн.п.
SFX h 0 ысьтым .
SFX h 0 ысьтымы .
SFX h 0 ысьтыд .
SFX h 0 ысьтыды .
SFX h 0 ысьтыз .
SFX h 0 ысьтызы .
SFX h 0 ысен . #отдал.п.
SFX h 0 ысеным .
SFX h 0 ысенымы .
SFX h 0 ысеныд .
SFX h 0 ысеныды .
SFX h 0 ысеныз .
SFX h 0 ысенызы .
SFX h 0 тӥ . 
SFX h 0 тӥм .
SFX h 0 тӥмы .
SFX h 0 тӥд .
SFX h 0 тӥды .
SFX h 0 тӥз .
SFX h 0 тӥзы .
SFX h 0 лань . #направ.п.
SFX h 0 ылань .
SFX h 0 ыдлань .
SFX h 0 ызлань .
SFX h 0 мылань .
SFX h 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX h 0 озь [^ь] #предельн.п.
SFX h ь ёзь [ь]
SFX h 0 озям .
SFX h 0 озяд .
SFX h 0 озяз .
SFX h 0 мыозь .
SFX h 0 дыозь .
SFX h 0 зыозь .
SFX h 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX h 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX h 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX h 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX h 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX h 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX h 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX h 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX h 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX h 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсам [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # местн.п. + входн.п
SFX h 0 ъёсамы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсад [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX h 0 ъёсады [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
