Udmurt.dic
вир/hp
вылтус/h
вылтыр/h
вын/h
дыр/h
ин/h
инбам/h
йыр/hp
ки/h
кибам/h
кузпал/h
кус/h
кыл/h
кымыс/h
лул/h
мугор/h
мукет/hp
мыл/h
мылкыд/h
ним/h
ныд/h
ныл/h
ныр/hp
пал/h
пель/hp
пыд/h
син/hp
сюлэм/hp
сям/h
тус/h
тусбуй/h
тыбыр/hp
шор/hp
шӧм/h
ым/h
ымныр/h
